Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2002
Sections; applicability.

Sections 8-2001 to 8-2005 apply to a compliance review committee whose functions are to evaluate and seek to improve:

(1) Loan underwriting standards;

(2) Asset quality;

(3) Financial reporting to federal or state regulatory agencies; or

(4) Compliance with federal or state statutory or regulatory requirements.

Laws 1995, LB 626, § 2.